Utah statutes.
26-3-8.   Disclosure of health data -- Discretion of department.
Any disclosure provided for in Section 26-3-7 shall be made at the discretion
of the department, except that the disclosure provided for in Subsection
26-3-7(4) must be made when the requirements of that paragraph have been met.
